California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) Upon receiving the Great Redwood Trail Agency’s rights, privileges, and interests relating to the agency’s rail right-of-way south of the dividing line pursuant to Section 93030 of the Government Code, the district shall designate a single point of contact for the agency.

(b) The district may partner or contract with trail agencies, including the Great Redwood Trail Agency, on creation and maintenance of the bicycle and pedestrian pathways under the district’s jurisdiction.

(c) The ancillary bicycle and pedestrian pathways that provide connections between and access to district station sites and the district’s other pathways shall be known as “The Great Redwood Trail, Southern Segment.”

(d) The planned bike and pedestrian pathway running from the district’s station in the City of Larkspur to the northern terminus of the Golden Gate Bridge in the County of Marin shall be known as the Great Redwood Trail. The facilities described in this subdivision are not the property of the Great Redwood Trail Agency and are not subject to, or within the scope of, the environmental impact report for the Great Redwood Trail, Southern Segment or the Great Redwood Trail within the jurisdiction of the Great Redwood Trail Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 424, Sec. 12.   (SB 727)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Rail Transit Facilities and Service [105095. - 105104.]

105095.

The district may provide a rail transit system for the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage by rail and provision of freight service by rail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 934, Sec. 15.   (SB 1029)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

105096.

(a) The district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control, or use rights-of-way, rail lines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, parking lots, and any and all other facilities necessary or convenient for rail transit within and without the district, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons and vehicles thereto, including ancillary bicycle and pedestrian pathways, and may acquire or contract for any interest in or rights to the use or joint use of any or all of the foregoing.

(b) The district may contract with any public agency or person for the operation of shuttle services necessary or convenient for rail
 transit.

(c) In the County of Marin, north of the City of San Rafael, the district shall locate commuter stations only within areas that are incorporated as of January 1, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 866, Sec. 4.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

105097.

The district may lease or contract for the use of its rail transit facilities, or any portion thereof, to any operator, and may provide for subleases by the operator upon any terms and conditions it deems in the public interest. As used in this section, “operator” means any public agency or any person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105098.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 105143, the board may contract with any public agency or person to provide rail transit facilities and services for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105099.

The district may construct and operate or acquire and operate rail transit works and facilities in, under, upon, over, across, or along any state or public highway or any stream, bay or watercourse, or over any of the lands that are the property of the state, to the same extent that these rights and privileges are granted to municipalities within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105100.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 105087, the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 53090) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code shall not be applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105101.

The district may enter into agreements for the joint use of any property and rights by the district and any city, public agency, or public utility operating transit facilities and may enter into agreements with any city, public agency, or public utility operating any transit facilities, wholly or partially within or without the district, for the joint use of any property of the district or of the city, public agency, or public utility, or for the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers, or pooling agreements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105102.

The district may, without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, accept contributions of money, grants, loans, rights-of-way, labor, materials, and any other property from the state or the United States, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, or from any public agency for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of rail transit facilities. The district may, without limitation by any other provisions of this part, enter into any contract and cooperate with and accept cooperation from
 the state or the United States, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, or any public agency in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, any rail transit facilities. The district may do any and all things necessary in order to obtain the aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105103.

The rates and charges for rail transit service furnished pursuant to this part shall be fixed by the board and shall be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105104.

The district shall work with the Federal Railroad Administration and any of its successor agencies to achieve safe, efficient, and compatible operations of both passenger rail and freight service along the rail line in the Counties of Sonoma and Marin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 866, Sec. 5.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Taxation [105115. - 105115.]

105115.

(a) Upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors, which shall include an affirmative vote of at least three directors from each county within the district appointed pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of Section 105020, the board may by resolution submit to the voters of the district a measure proposing a retail transactions and use tax ordinance in accordance with the provisions of Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the special taxes authorized in this article may also be imposed by a qualified voter initiative pursuant to
 Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9300) of Division 9 of the Elections Code if the qualified voter initiative complies with both of the following requirements:

(1) The qualified voter initiative proposes a rate for the retail transactions and use tax that is no less than one-quarter of 1 percent.

(2) The qualified voter initiative proposes expenditures for the revenues generated from the retail transactions and use tax that are consistent with the purpose of providing a rail transit system under the jurisdiction of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 866, Sec. 7.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Investments and Deposits [105125. - 105126.]

105125.

The district’s investment of any surplus money in its treasury, including money in any sinking fund, shall be in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 53600) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105126.

The district’s deposit of district money shall be in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 53630) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Personnel [105140. - 105181.]



  ARTICLE 1. Employee Relations [105140. - 105143.]

105140.

Except as otherwise provided in this article and in Article 2 (commencing with Section 105150), the determination of questions concerning employee representation and the conduct of employee-employer relations within the district shall be governed by the Meyers-Milias-Brown Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105141.

Except as otherwise provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 105150), whenever a majority of the employees employed by the district in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by a labor organization, and upon determining that the labor organization represents at least a majority of the employees in the appropriate unit, the board and the accredited representative of employees shall bargain in good faith and make all reasonable efforts to reach agreement on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours,
 and other terms and conditions of employment within the scope of representation set forth in Section 3504 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105142.

(a) If, after a reasonable period of time, representatives of the district and the accredited representatives of the employees fail to reach agreement either on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment or the interpretation or application of the terms of an existing contract, upon the agreement of both the district and the representatives of the employees, the dispute may be submitted to an arbitration board.

(b) The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the district and two representatives of the labor organization, and they shall endeavor to agree upon the selection of a fifth member. If they are unable to agree, the names of five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the State Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the district shall, alternately, strike a name from this list, and the name remaining after the labor organization and the district have stricken four names shall be designated as the fifth arbitrator and chairperson of the board of arbitration. The labor organization and the district shall determine by lot who shall first strike a name from the list. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final and binding upon the parties thereto.

(c) Each party shall be responsible for the expense of the presentation of its case. All other expenses of
 arbitration shall be borne equally by the parties and the expenses may include the making of a verbatim record of the proceedings and transcript of that record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105143.

The district may contract for management services with any public agency or person and may contract for operations and maintenance services with the district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code. However, the district may not contract out the performance of services performed by or fairly claimable by employees of a bargaining unit without the agreement of the accredited representative of that bargaining unit’s employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transfer of Collective Bargaining Rights [105150. - 105155.]

105150.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the creation of the district may adversely affect the collective bargaining rights, wages, benefits, and employment opportunities of employees of the district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105151.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 105140), in order to protect and preserve the collective bargaining rights of employees of the district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code, whose employment opportunities may be adversely affected by the adoption and implementation of this division, upon the district’s decision to commence rail service, the district shall establish at least three collective bargaining units comprised of the following:

(a) A transportation operators collective bargaining unit.

(b) A transportation maintenance collective bargaining unit.

(c) A transportation dispatch and equipment servicing collective bargaining unit.

For purposes of this section, the district’s decision to commence rail service shall be effected by the district’s adoption of a resolution that confirms that sufficient financing exists to undertake rail service and declares the intention of the district to take all reasonable and necessary steps to commence rail service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105152.

For a period of four years, commencing with the district’s decision to commence rail service as provided in Section 105151, or until the expiration of the current collective bargaining agreement, whichever is later, employees of the district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code, who are employed by that district in classifications assigned to the same or similar collective bargaining units as those set out in Section 105151, shall be given priority of employment within the collective
 bargaining units set forth in Section 105151. Any dispute arising over the appropriate placement within a collective bargaining unit or over any assignment of classifications made by the district to a bargaining unit set forth in Section 105151 shall be resolved by the Public Employee Relations Board. Any determination of the Public Employee Relations Board shall be consistent with the intent of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105153.

The district shall recognize and bargain with, as the accredited representative of the employees within the collective bargaining units set forth in Section 105151, the accredited collective bargaining representatives that represent the same or similar bargaining units within the district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code. This recognition shall be maintained unless changed by mutual agreement of the district and the affected collective bargaining representative or the representative is
 decertified in accordance with the rules and procedures of the Public Employee Relations Board for the certification and decertification of employee representatives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105154.

Employees of the district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code who transfer to the district and into a collective bargaining unit set forth in Section 105151, shall be credited with any accrued seniority earned at the district from which they have transferred, and shall not suffer a loss in their rate of wages, pension benefits, pension accrual rights, health benefits, retiree health benefits, vacation accrual, or other seniority-based benefits, such as job bidding and transfer rights, as
 a result of their transfer to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105155.

To facilitate implementation of the employee rights enumerated in this section, the district and the district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code may engage in joint collective bargaining with the accredited representatives of the collective bargaining units set forth in Section 105151 and the same or similar collective bargaining units within the district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code to establish uniform
 wages, health benefits, pension benefits, and other uniform terms and conditions of employment. To maintain continuity of pension benefits, the district shall have the right to appoint at least one representative to any joint labor-management retirement board that administers a retirement plan in which employees of the district and employees of the district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code are participants, provided that an equal number of employer and employee representatives on the retirement board is maintained. In addition, the district shall enter into a reciprocity agreement through the Public Employees’ Retirement System (PERS) which recognizes PERS service with the district organized pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code of any district employee employed in a collective bargaining unit set forth in Section 105151 whose members’ pensions are provided through
 PERS.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rights of Employees of Existing Facilities [105160. - 105161.]

105160.

(a) Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned utility, either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, to the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of the utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired who have been employed by the utility for at least 75 days shall be appointed to comparable positions in the district without examination. These employees shall be given sick leave, seniority, and vacation credits in accordance with the records of the
 acquired public utility. No employee of any acquired public utility shall suffer any worsening of wages, seniority, pension, vacation, or other benefits by reason of the acquisition.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to officers or managerial employees of the acquired utility except as designated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105161.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, that has a pension plan in operation, members and beneficiaries of the pension plan shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations, and status with respect to the established system. The outstanding obligations and liabilities of the public utility by reason of that pension plan shall be considered and taken into account and allowance made therefor in the purchase price of the public utility.
 The persons entitled to pension benefits as provided in this section and the benefits that are provided shall be specified in the agreement or order by which any public utility is acquired by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Retirement System [105170. - 105172.]

105170.

The adoption, terms, and conditions of any retirement system covering employees of the district in a bargaining unit represented by a labor organization shall be pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between the labor organization and the district. For purposes of this section, “officers” does not include members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105171.

The board may contract with the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System or with a retirement system maintained pursuant to the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937 and enter all, or any portion, of its employees under either of those systems. Employees of the district in a bargaining unit that is represented by a labor organization shall not be included in the contract except as authorized by a collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105172.

All persons receiving pension benefits from an acquired public utility, and all persons entitled to pension benefits under any pension plan of the acquired public utility, may become members or receive pensions under a pension plan established by the district by mutual agreement of those persons and the district. The agreement may provide for the waiver of all rights, privileges, benefits, and status with respect to the pension plan of the acquired public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Other Benefits [105181. - 105181.]

105181.

The district shall obtain coverage for the district and its employees under the appropriate federal and state workers’ compensation, unemployment compensation, and disability and unemployment insurance laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 866, Sec. 8.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Bonds and Other Evidence of Indebtedness [105200. - 105262.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authorization and Issuance of General Obligation Bonds [105200. - 105213.]

105200.

Whenever the board deems it necessary for the district to incur a bonded indebtedness for the acquisition or improvement of real property authorized by this part or necessary or convenient for the carrying out of the powers of the district, the board shall, by ordinance, adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all members of the board, so declare and call an election to be held in the district for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district, provided the total amount of
 bonds issued and outstanding pursuant to this article shall not exceed 15 percent of the assessed value of the taxable property of the district as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the counties within the district. The ordinance shall state:

(a) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to or connected with the accomplishment of those purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agents, financial consultant, and other fees; bond and other reserve funds; working capital; bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period not to exceed three years thereafter; and expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(b) The estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes.

(c) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(d) The maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not exceed 50 years from the date thereof or the date of each series thereof.

(e) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed 7 percent per annum.

(f) The proposition to be submitted to the voters, which may include one or more purposes.

(g) The date of the election.

(h) The manner of holding the election and the procedure for voting for or against the measure.

(i) The ordinance may also contain any
 other matters authorized by this part or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105201.

Notice of holding of the election shall be given by publishing, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the ordinance calling the election in at least one newspaper published in the district. No other notice of the election need be given. Except as otherwise provided in the ordinance, the election shall be conducted as other district elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105202.

If any proposition is defeated by the electors, the board shall not call another election on a substantially similar proposition to be held within six months after the prior election. If a petition requesting submission of this type of a proposition, signed by 15 percent of the district electors, as shown by the votes cast for all candidates for governor within the district at the last gubernatorial election, is filed with the board, the board may call an election before the expiration of six months.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105203.

If two-thirds of the electors voting on the proposition vote for it, then the board may, by resolution, at the time or times it deems proper, issue bonds of the district for the whole or any part of the amount of the indebtedness so authorized and may from time to time, by resolution, provide for the issuance of any necessary amounts, until the full amount of the bonds authorized shall have been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates and different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond
 need not mature on an anniversary of its date. The maximum term the bonds of any series shall run before maturity shall not exceed 50 years from the date of each series respectively. In the resolution or resolutions, the board shall prescribe the form of the bonds (including, without limitation, registered bonds and coupon bonds) and the form of any coupons to be attached thereto, the registration, conversion, and exchange privileges, if any, pertaining thereto, and fix the time when the whole or any part of the principal shall become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105204.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding 7 percent per annum, payable semiannually, except that the first interest payable on the bonds or any series thereof may be for any period not exceeding one year as determined by the board. In the resolution or resolutions providing for the issuance of the bonds, the board may also provide for call and redemption of the bonds prior to maturity at the times and prices and upon any other terms it may specify, but no bond shall be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains a
 recital to that effect or unless a statement to that effect is printed thereon. The denomination or denominations of the bonds shall be stated in the resolution providing for their issuance, but shall not be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000). The principal of and interest on the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the district or at any other place or places that may be designated, or at either place or places at the option of the holders of the bonds. The bonds, or series thereof, shall be dated and numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the chairperson of the board and the treasurer, countersigned by the secretary and the official seal of the district attached. The interest coupons of the bonds shall be signed by the treasurer. All signatures, countersignatures, and seal may be printed, lithographed, or mechanically reproduced, except that one of the signatures or countersignatures on the bonds shall be manually affixed. If any officer
 whose signature or countersignature appears on bonds or coupons ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, his or her signature is as effective as if he or she had remained in office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105205.

The bonds may be sold as the board determines by resolution but for not less than par. Before selling the bonds or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in a manner as it may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at
 private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105206.

Delivery of any bonds may be made at any place either inside or outside the state, and the purchase price may be received in cash or bank credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105207.

All accrued interest and premiums received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury to the credit of the proper improvement fund and applied exclusively to the purposes for which the debt was incurred; provided, however, that when those purposes have been accomplished any moneys remaining in the improvement fund (a) shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on
 the bonds, or (b) shall be placed in a fund to be used for the purchase of outstanding bonds of the district from time to time in the open market at the prices and in the manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, as the board may determine. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105208.

After the expiration of three years after a bond election the board may determine, by ordinance adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all the members of the board, that any or all of the bonds authorized at the election remaining unsold shall not be issued or sold. When the ordinance takes effect, the authorization to issue these bonds shall become void.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105209.

Whenever the board deems that the expenditure of money for the purposes for which the bonds were authorized by the voters is impractical or unwise, it may, by ordinance adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all members of the board, so declare and call an election to be held in the district for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of these bonds for some other purposes or, in the case where bonds have been sold, the proposition to use the proceeds for some other purposes. The
 procedure, so far as applicable, shall be the same as when a bond proposition is originally submitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105210.

The board may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the district upon the terms, at the times, and in the manner which it determines. Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all or any part of the principal of the outstanding bonds, the interest thereon, and the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity and all expenses of the refunding. The provisions of this article for issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of the
 refunding bonds, except that (a) no election need be called or held for the purpose of authorizing the issuance of refunding bonds, and (b) when refunding bonds are to be exchanged for outstanding bonds, the method of exchange shall be determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105211.

The provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 53500) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105212.

Any bonds that are issued under the provisions of this article shall be legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies; and for state school funds. Whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state, the money or funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this part. Whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school
 districts, or other districts within this state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public moneys, the bonds issued under this part may be so used. The provisions of this article shall be in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105213.

The board may enter into any covenants deemed proper to provide for issuance of additional parity bonds and the priority and pledge of special taxes; and any other covenants that are customary or desirable in the issuance of any bonds payable out of special funds or that are necessary, convenient, or desirable to secure the bonds or tending to make them more marketable, subject to the provisions of the ordinance calling the bond election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Revenue Bonds [105220. - 105221.]

105220.

The district may issue bonds, payable from revenue of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by the district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), all of the provisions of which are applicable to the district, except that Article 3 (commencing with Section 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and the limitations set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 54402 and in Sections 54403 and
 54418 of the Government Code do not apply to the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this article. As used in Section 54315 of the Government Code, “revenues” shall include, but not be limited to, the proceeds of, or any portion of the proceeds of, a sales and use tax imposed under Article 5 (commencing with Section 105115) of Chapter 4 or under any other provisions of law, so long as the resolution authorizing the bonds contains no restriction that would provide that this tax shall not continue to be imposed until the bonds are fully paid or a provision has been made for their payment in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105221.

The district is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall, for all purposes of this part, include the system or any or all rail transit facilities and all additions, extensions, and improvements thereto authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the district. The district may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for any one or more rail
 transit facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the district or, in the alternative, may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for the acquisition, construction, and completion of any rail transit facilities. Nothing in this article shall prevent the district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this part for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the rail transit facilities authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the board may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Equipment Trust Certificates [105230. - 105233.]

105230.

The district shall have power to purchase rail transit equipment such as cars or rolling equipment; and may execute agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates in the forms customarily used by private corporations engaged in the rail transit business appropriate to effect purchase and leasing of rail transit equipment and may dispose of the equipment trust certificates upon the terms and conditions the board deems appropriate. Payment for the equipment, or rentals therefor, may be made in installments, and the deferred installments may be evidenced by
 equipment trust certificates payable from any source or sources of funds specified in the certificates that are or will be legally available to the district. Title to the equipment shall not rest in the district until the equipment trust certificates are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105231.
